Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB716.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4 of the act of July 14, 1961 (P.L.637, No.329), known as the Wage Payment and Collection Law, is amended to read:Section 4. Notification.--(a) It shall be the duty of every employer to notify his employes at the time of hiring of the time and place of payment and the rate of pay and the amount of any fringe benefits or wage supplements to be paid to the employe, a third party or a fund for the benefit of the employe 1234567891011121314151617181920 and any change with respect to any of these items prior to the time of said change. Alternatively, however, every employer may give such notification by posting the aforementioned facts and keeping them posted conspicuously at the employer's place of business. Further, in cases where wages, amounts of any fringe benefits or wage supplements are set forth in a bona fide collective bargaining agreement and copies of that agreement are available to employes, then this shall satisfy the employer's duty to give notice.(b) It shall be the duty of every employer to provide notice to his employes at the time of hiring of a summary of this act and any regulations issued under this act applicable to the employer.Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 8.1. Duty of Employer.--(a) Every employer shall keep a summary of this act and any regulations issued under this act applicable to the employer posted in a conspicuous place where employes normally pass and can read it. Employers shall, upon request to the department, be furnished with copies of the summary without charge.(b) Every employer who fails to provide notice to an employe as required under section 4(b), or fails to post in a conspicuous place a summary of this act and any regulations as required under subsection (a), shall be guilty of a summary offense and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500).Section 3. Section 9.1(g) of the act is amended to read:Section 9.1. Civil Remedies and Penalties.--* * *(g) [No] (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), no administrative proceedings or legal action shall be instituted 20250HB0716PN0735 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under the provisions of this act for the collection of unpaid wages or liquidated damages more than three years after the day on which such wages were due and payable as provided in sections 3 and 5.(2) If an employer has failed to provide notice to an employe as required under section 4 or has failed to post a summary as required under section 8.1, the time limitation under paragraph (1) shall not apply. However, no administrative proceeding or legal action shall be instituted under the provisions of this act for the collection of unpaid wages or liquidated damages more than three years after the day on which such wages were due and payable, as provided in sections 3 and 5, or the day on which the notice requirements under section 4 or the posting requirements under section 8.1 are satisfied, whichever is later.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0716PN0735 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516